Utah statutes.
19-6-905.   Notification of property owner -- Notification of municipality or county.

(1) (a)  If the local health department determines a property is contaminated, it shall notify the owner of record that the property has been placed on the contamination list and shall provide to the owner information regarding remediation options and the requirements necessary to clean up the property, obtain certification that the property is decontaminated, and remove the property from the contamination list.

(b)  The notification shall include a deadline for the owner to provide to the local health department information on how the owner plans to address the contamination.

(c)  This part does not require that decontamination be conducted by a certified decontamination specialist.  However, upon completion of the decontamination, the property must be determined to be decontaminated in accordance with Subsection 19-6-903(4)(c) in order to be removed from the contamination list.

(2)  If the local health department does not receive a response from the owner of record within the time period specified in the notice, or the owner of record advises the local health department that the owner does not intend to take action or that the reported property will be abandoned, the local health department shall notify the municipality in which the reported property is located, or the county, if the location is in an unincorporated area, of the owner of record's response or lack of response.

